apertium-sco.sco.dix
<pardef n="t/yne__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>yne</l>           <r>yne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yne</l>           <r>yne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynes</l>          <r>yne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>int</l>          <r>yne<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>int</l>          <r>yne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynin</l>         <r>yne<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynin</l>         <r>yne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynin</l>         <r>yne<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="w/ark__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ark</l>           <r>ark<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ark</l>           <r>ark<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arks</l>          <r>ark<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rocht</l>          <r>ark<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rocht</l>          <r>ark<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arkin</l>         <r>ark<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arkin</l>         <r>ark<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arkin</l>         <r>ark<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="w/in__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>           <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>           <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>           <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innin</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innin</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>innin</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="wr/ite__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ite</l>          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ites</l>         <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>           <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ote</l>          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itin</l>         <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itin</l>         <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itin</l>         <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d/ae__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ae</l>        <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ae</l>        <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aein</l>      <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aein</l>      <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aein</l>      <r>ae<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- AUXILIARY & MODAL VERBS PARDEFS -->

<pardef n="d/ae__vaux">
  <e>       <p><l>ae</l>           <r>ae<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>           <r>ae<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>           <r>ae<s n="vbdo"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ha/e__vbhaver">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>            <r>e<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ae</l>           <r>e<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>           <r>e<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aed</l>          <r>e<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aed</l>          <r>e<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vin</l>          <r>e<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="c/an__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e r="RL" c="mig arreglo raro, revisar"><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oud</l>       <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ould</l>      <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="will/__vbmod">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="na__S"/></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- DETERMINER PARDEFS -->

<pardef n="whit__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="a__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="aw__predet">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="queen__prenom">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prenom"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prenom"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="that__rel">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="the__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="th/ir__det">
  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>ir<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ae</l>        <r>ir<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="th/at__det">
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ose</l>       <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="anither__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ither__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="her__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- GENITIVE PARDEFS -->

<!-- This pardef takes care of genitives for words ending in s. e.g., Paris' -->
<pardef n="gen__apos">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><j/>'<s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- PROPER NOUNS PARDEFS -->

<pardef n="Siberia__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e r="LR" lm="a">        <i>a</i><par n="a__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="an">       <i>an</i><par n="a__det"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="a">        <p><l><a/>a</l><r>a</r></p><par n="a__det"/></e>
<e lm="anither">         <i>anither</i><par n="anither__det"/></e>
<e lm="her">             <i>her</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
<e lm="his">             <i>his</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
<e lm="ither">           <i>ither</i><par n="anither__det"/></e>
<e lm="its">             <i>its</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
<e lm="ivery">           <i>ivery</i><par n="anither__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ivry">     <i>ivry</i><par n="anither__det"/></e>
<e lm="ma">              <i>ma</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
<e lm="mony">            <i>mony</i><par n="the__det"/></e>
<e lm="my">              <i>my</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
<e lm="nae">             <i>nae</i><par n="anither__det"/></e>
<e lm="no">              <i>no</i><par n="anither__det"/></e>
<e lm="ony">             <i>ony</i><par n="a__det"/></e>
<e lm="oor">             <i>oor</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
<e lm="the">             <i>the</i><par n="the__det"/></e>
<e lm="thir">            <i>th</i><par n="th/ir__det"/></e>
<e lm="whit">            <i>whit</i><par n="whit__det"/></e>
<e lm="whitever">        <i>whitever</i><par n="anither__det"/></e>
<e lm="yer">             <i>yer</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
<e lm="your">            <i>your</i><par n="her__det"/></e>
<e lm="aw">              <i>aw</i><par n="aw__predet"/></e>
<e lm="that">            <i>that</i><par n="that__rel"/></e>
<e lm="dae">             <i>d</i><par n="d/ae__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dae">             <i>d</i><par n="d/ae__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="can">             <i>c</i><par n="c/an__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="will">            <i>will</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="wull">            <i>wull</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="sall">            <i>sall</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="wad">             <i>wad</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="wid">      <i>wad</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="buid">            <i>buid</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="mey">             <i>mey</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="maun">            <i>maun</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="coud">            <i>coud</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="could">           <i>could</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="micht">           <i>micht</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="shoud">           <i>shoud</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="Queen">           <i>Queen</i><par n="queen__prenom"/></e>
<e lm="Lord">            <i>Lord</i><par n="queen__prenom"/></e>
<e lm="Bishop">          <i>Bishop</i><par n="queen__prenom"/></e>
<e lm="Saunt">           <i>Saunt</i><par n="queen__prenom"/></e>
<e lm="Sir">             <i>Sir</i><par n="queen__prenom"/></e>
<e lm="hae">               <i>ha</i><par n="ha/e__vbhaver"/></e>
<e lm="tyne">              <i>t</i><par n="t/yne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undae">             <i>und</i><par n="d/ae__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wark">              <i>w</i><par n="w/ark__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="win">               <i>w</i><par n="w/in__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="write">            <i>wr</i><par n="wr/ite__vblex"/></e>
